Arkansas, session 2025, SB585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-4-217 is amended to read as follows:
11-4-217. Records kept and provided by employer.
(a) Every employer subject to any provision of this subchapter or of
any rule issued under this subchapter shall make and keep for a period of not
less than three (3) years in or about the premises wherein any employee is
employed a record of the name, address, and occupation of each of his or her
employees, the rate of pay, the amount paid each pay period to each employee,
and such other information as the Director of the Division of Labor shall
prescribe by rule as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the
provisions of this subchapter or of the rules under this subchapter.
(b) The records shall be open for inspection or transcription by the
director or his or her authorized representative at any reasonable time.
(c) Every employer shall furnish to the director or to his or her
authorized representative on demand a sworn statement of the records and
information upon forms prescribed or approved by the director.
(d)(1) Every employer with more than ten (10) employees subject to any
provision of this subchapter or any rule issued under this subchapter shall
*CRH166*
04-07-2025 15:50:38 CRH166

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB585
furnish to each employee who is a minor at the beginning of the pay cycle at
the time the employee’s wages are paid an itemized statement showing the:
(A) Pay basis in hours or days worked;
(B) Rate or rates of pay;
(C) Gross pay; and
(D) All deductions from the pay for the respective pay
period.
(2)(A) For purposes of this subsection, a person who has reached
eighteen (18) years of age shall be considered to have reached the age of
majority and be of full age for all purposes.
(B) Until the age of eighteen (18) years is attained, a
person shall be considered a minor.

/s/G. Leding






















04-07-2025 15:50:38 CRH166